nb: Resultatvisning: Digital; Linjebasert; Pluss/minussymbol; Annet
es: Pantalla de resultados: Digital; En línea; Símbolo más/menos; Otros
lt-LT: Rezultatų rodymas: Skaitmeninė; Linijinis; Pliuso / minuso ženklas; Kita
hr-HR: Prikaz rezultata: Digitalni; Linijski; Simbol plus/minus; Ostalo
cs: Zobrazení výsledku: Digitální; Řádkové; Symbol plus/minus; Jiné
fr: Affichage du résultat: Numérique; Basé sur une ligne; Symbole plus/moins; Autre
de: Ergebnisanzeige: Digital; Linienbasiert; Plus/Minus-Symbol; Sonstiges
th: การแสดงผลลัพธ์: ดิจิทัล; แบบขีด; สัญลักษณ์บวก/ลบ; อื่นๆ
hu: Eredmény kijelzése.: Digitális; Vonalalapú; Plusz-/mínuszjel; Egyéb
zh-TW: 結果顯示: 數位; 線路型; 加/減符號; 其他
sl-SI: Prikaz rezultata: Digitalno; Črtice; Simbol plus/minus; Drugo
pt-BR: Tela de resultados: Digital; Baseado em linha; Símbolo de mais/menos; Outro
pl: Wyświetlanie wyników: Cyfrowe; Liniowa; Symbol plus/minus; Inne
da: Resultatvisning: Digital; Linjebaseret; Plus/minus-symbol; Andet
vi: Hiển thị kết quả: Kỹ thuật số; Dựa trên dòng; Dấu cộng/trừ; Khác
en: Result display: Digital; Line-based; Plus/Minus symbol; Other
it: Visualizzazione del risultato: Digitale; Basato su linea; Simbolo più/meno; Altro
sk-SK: Zobrazenie výsledku: Digitálny; Riadkový; Symbol plus/mínus; Iné
ru: Отображение результата: Цифровой; Линейный; Символ плюс/минус; Другой
ro-RO: Afișarea rezultatului: Digital; Sub formă de linii; Simbol plus/minus; Altele
zh-CN: 结果显示: 数字化; 基于行; 加/减符号; 其他
tr: Sonuç Gösterimi: Dijital; Hat tabanlı; Artı/Eksi sembolü; Diğer
pt-PT: Apresentação de resultado: Digital; Baseado em linha; Símbolo de mais/menos; Outro
ja: 結果表示: デジタル; ラインベース; プラス/マイナス記号; その他
bg-BG: Показване на резултата: Цифров; Линеен; Символ плюс/минус; Други
ko: 결과 표시: 디지털; 선 기반; 플러스/마이너스 기호; 기타
nl: Resultaatweergave: Digitaal; Lijngebaseerd; Plus/Minus-symbool; Andere
sv: Resultatvisning: Digital; Linjebaserat; Plus/minus-symbol; Övrigt
fi: Tulosnäyttö: Digitaalinen; Linjapohjainen; Plus/miinussymboli; Muu
el: Εμφάνιση αποτελεσμάτων: Ψηφιακός; Βάσει γραμμής; Σύμβολο συν/πλην; Άλλο